Georgia statutes. TITLE 21 Elections
CHAPTER 4 Recall of Public Officers

Cross references.

Recall of public officials holding elective office, Ga. Const. 1983, Art. II, Sec. II, Para. IV.

Special elections and primaries generally, §

21-2-540

et seq.

Editor’s notes.

Former Chapter 4 of Title 21, known as the “Public Officer’s Recall Act” was declared unconstitutional in the case of Mitchell v. Wilkerson,

258 Ga. 608

,

372 S.E.2d 432

(1988). That chapter consisted of Code Sections

21-4-1

through

21-4-19

and was derived from Ga. L. 1979, p. 1612; Ga. L. 1980, p. 1436; Ga. L. 1982, p. 1512; Ga. L. 1982, p. 1653; Ga. L. 1983, p. 140; Ga. L. 1983, p. 884; Ga. L. 1984, p. 133; Ga. L. 1987, p. 34; and Ga. L. 1987, p. 896.

Ga. L. 1989, p. 1721, § 2, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act shall become effective upon its approval by the Governor or upon its becoming law without such approval and shall be applicable to every public official who holds elective office on or after the effective date of this Act. The provisions of this Act shall apply with respect to an incumbent public official where the act or omission constituting grounds for recall, as specified in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (7) of Code Section 21-4-3, occurred in a previous term of office but was withheld from public knowledge or public disclosure until subsequent to the general election at which the incumbent was last elected, provided that an application for a recall petition is filed within 12 months after such general election.” This Act became effective April 19, 1989.

Law reviews.

For note on 1989 enactment of this chapter, see 6 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 236 (1989).

21-4-1.
Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Recall Act of 1989.”

History.

Code 1981, §

21-4-1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1989, p. 1721, § 1.

Cross references.

Vacation of office, T. 45, C. 5.

21-4-2.
Legislative intent.

The General Assembly finds that the electorate of the state overwhelmingly ratified an amendment to the Constitution of Georgia at the general election in November, 1978, authorizing the General Assembly to provide by general law for uniform and exclusive procedures to recall public officials who hold elective office and to repeal all local recall laws and prohibit the future enactment of any local recall laws. In furtherance of the mandate of the electorate, by this general law the General Assembly establishes uniform and exclusive procedures relating to the recall of all state and local officials who hold elective office.

History.

Code 1981, §

21-4-2

, enacted by Ga. L. 1989, p. 1721, § 1.

Cross references.

Recall of public officials holding elective office, Ga. Const. 1983, Art. II, Sec. II, Para. IV.

21-4-3.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, the term:

“Elected county school board members” and “elected county school superintendents” shall be considered county officers.

“Elected education board members” and “elected school superintendents” of any independent school system shall be considered municipal officers.

“Election superintendent” means:

In the case of any elected state officers, the Secretary of State;

In the case of any elected county officers, the county board of elections, if a county has such, or the judge of the probate court, provided that, if such judge of the probate court is the officer sought to be recalled, then the election superintendent shall be the clerk of the superior court; and

In the case of any elected municipal officers, the municipal clerk or municipal board of elections or municipal election superintendent, if the municipality has such a board or election officer.

(3.1)

“Elective office” means an office filled by the exercise of the franchise of vote by electors in a general or special election as defined under the laws of this state.

“Elector” means any person who possesses all of the qualifications for voting now or hereafter prescribed by the laws of this state and who has registered in accordance with Chapter 2 of this title.

“Electoral district” means the area in which the electors reside who are qualified to vote for any of the candidates offering for a particular office.

“Failure to perform duties prescribed by law” means the willful neglect or failure by an official to perform a duty imposed by statute.

“Grounds for recall” means:

That the official has, while holding public office, conducted himself or herself in a manner which relates to and adversely affects the administration of his or her office and adversely affects the rights and interests of the public; and

That the official:

Has committed an act or acts of malfeasance while in office;

Has violated his or her oath of office;

Has committed an act of misconduct in office;

Is guilty of a failure to perform duties prescribed by law; or

Has willfully misused, converted, or misappropriated, without authority, public property or public funds entrusted to or associated with the elective office to which the official has been elected or appointed.

Discretionary performance of a lawful act or a prescribed duty shall not constitute a ground for recall of an elected public official.

(7.1)

“Legal sufficiency” means, solely as applied to the duties or functions of the election superintendent, a determination of the completeness of an application for a recall petition or a recall petition and a determination that an application for a recall petition or a recall petition contains a sufficient number of valid signatures. Such determinations shall not include any review of the sufficiency of the ground or grounds for the recall and the fact or facts upon which such ground or grounds are based.

“Misconduct in office” means an unlawful act committed willfully by an elected public official or a willful violation of the code of ethics for government service contained in Code Section 45-10-1.

“Official sponsors” or “sponsors” means the electors who circulate or file an application for a recall petition who were registered and eligible to vote in the last general or special election for the office held by the officer sought to be recalled and who reside in the electoral district of the officer sought to be recalled.

History.

Code 1981, §

21-4-3

, enacted by Ga. L. 1989, p. 1721, § 1; Ga. L. 1990, p. 1939, § 1; Ga. L. 1991, p. 133, § 1; Ga. L. 1999, p. 21, § 1; Ga. L. 2014, p. 866, § 21/SB 340.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1990, p. 1939, § 8, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that the Act shall only apply to recall proceedings under Chapter 4 of Title 21 which are instituted on or after July 1, 1990.

21-4-4.
Officers subject to recall; number of electors needed to demand recall; limitation on number of public officials who may be subjects of a particular recall petition; grounds for recall.

Every public official who holds elective office, either by election or by appointment, is subject to recall from office by electors who are registered and qualified to vote in the recall election and who reside in the electoral district from which candidates are elected to that office:

In the case of a state officer whose electoral district encompasses the entire state, the number of electors necessary to petition the recall of the officer shall be equal to at least 15 percent of the number of electors who were registered and qualified to vote at the last preceding election for any candidate offering for the office held by the officer. At least one-fifteenth of the number of electors necessary to petition the recall of the officer must reside in each of the United States congressional districts in the state as said congressional districts may now or hereafter exist; or

In the case of a state officer whose electoral district encompasses only a part of the state or in the case of a local officer, the number of electors necessary to petition the recall of the officer shall be equal to at least 30 percent of the number of electors registered and qualified to vote at the last preceding election for any candidate offering for the office held by the officer.

No recall petition shall demand the recall of more than one public official.

Every public official who holds elective office, either by election or by appointment, is subject to recall on the grounds that such public official has, while holding any public office, conducted himself or herself in a manner which relates to and adversely affects the administration of his or her current office and adversely affects the rights and interests of the public if one or more additional grounds for recall exist as set forth in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (7) of Code Section 21-4-3.

History.

Code 1981, §

21-4-4

, enacted by Ga. L. 1989, p. 1721, § 1; Ga. L. 2001, p. 230, § 18.

Law reviews.

For note on the 2001 amendment to this Code section, see 18 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 114 (2001).

For article, “Local Government Law,” see 53 Mercer L. Rev. 389 (2001).

21-4-5.
Recall petition — Application for and time of filing; sponsors; withdrawal of signature; duties of election superintendent; printing and distribution of recall petition forms by Secretary of State.

No application for a recall petition may be filed during the first 180 days or during the last 180 days of the term of office of any public official subject to recall. No person shall be authorized to circulate, sponsor, or sign such application unless such person is an elector or sponsor as defined in Code Section 21-4-3.

The application shall include:

The name and office of the person sought to be recalled;

The printed names and signatures of the official sponsors, the date signed, residence addresses, and the name of the county of residence;

The designation of one of the sponsors as the petition chairperson who shall represent the sponsors on all matters pertaining to the recall application and petition;

A statement that: _______________ (name and office) has, while holding public office, conducted himself or herself in a manner which relates to and adversely affects the administration of his or her office and adversely affects the rights and interests of the public and stating the appropriate ground or grounds for recall as set forth in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (7) of Code Section 21-4-3 with a brief statement of the fact or facts upon which the ground or grounds are based. Such statement shall be typed, printed, or reproduced by the election superintendent on the face of each application issued; and

An affidavit by the petition chairperson and the person circulating such recall application that each person sponsoring or signing such recall application is an elector of the electoral district of the officer sought to be recalled and that the fact or facts upon which the ground or grounds for recall are based are true.

The affidavit required by division (i) of this subparagraph shall be in the following form:

Click to view

No notary public may sign the application as an elector or serve as a circulator of any application which he or she notarized. Any and all sheets of an application for a recall petition that have the circulator’s affidavit notarized by a notary public who also served as a circulator of one or more sheets of the application for a recall petition or who signed one of the sheets of the petition as an elector shall be disqualified and rejected.

Applications shall be issued by the election superintendent who shall assign a number to each application. Such number shall appear on the face of each application. The election superintendent shall keep records of applications issued, including the date of issuance and number assigned. The election superintendent shall immediately notify in writing the public officer named for recall in the application that an application for a recall petition has been officially issued for circulation.

The official application forms shall be printed by the office of the Secretary of State in substantially the form prescribed in this subsection and distributed to election superintendents.

The number of official sponsors necessary to file an application for a recall petition must be equal in number to at least 100 electors or equal in number to at least 10 percent of the number of electors who were registered to vote at the last preceding election for any of the candidates offering for the office held by the public official sought to be recalled, whichever is smaller.

Sponsors of a recall petition, before causing the petition to be circulated, shall submit the application for the petition to the election superintendent designated in Code Section 21-4-3 and request official recall petition forms.

At any time prior to the date the election superintendent receives the application for a recall petition, an elector who has signed the application as an official sponsor may request withdrawal of his or her signature from the application by executing and filing an affidavit signed and sworn to before a notary public which affirms the elector’s intention to withdraw his or her signature from the application. The official affidavit of signature withdrawal shall be printed by the office of the Secretary of State and distributed to election superintendents. The form of the affidavit shall be substantially as prescribed in Code Section 21-4-9.

No application for a recall petition shall be accepted for verification if more than 15 days have elapsed since the application forms were issued to the sponsors. If an application for a recall petition contains more than one sheet, such application, when offered for filing, shall be bound together and each sheet shall be numbered consecutively at the foot of each page beginning with page one.

On receipt of the application, the election superintendent shall file the application and proceed to determine the legal sufficiency of the application and determine if the signers are qualified electors eligible to sign the application. The election superintendent is granted unrestricted authority to examine the registration records maintained by the board of registrars, to receive evidence and testimony, and to require the personal appearance of any person signing such application for the purpose of making such determination. If the election superintendent finds that any signer is not a qualified elector eligible to sign the application, such signature shall not be counted in determining whether the application contains a sufficient number of signatures as required by law. The nullification of a signature on an application shall not affect the validity of other signatures contained in such application. The election superintendent shall certify the legal sufficiency or insufficiency of the application for a recall petition within five days after receiving the application, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, and legal holidays; provided, however, that the judge of the superior court may, upon proper application and good cause shown, grant an additional period of time not to exceed 15 days for the election superintendent to verify the application.

The election superintendent shall immediately notify in writing the public officer named for recall in the application that a completed application for a recall petition has been filed with the election superintendent for verification.

No application for a recall petition shall be amended, supplemented, or returned after it has been filed with the election superintendent for verification.

Upon certifying the legal sufficiency of the application, the election superintendent shall immediately officially file the certification of the application, issue official recall petition forms, assign a number to the recall petition, which number shall appear on the face of each petition form, and issue that number to the sponsors. A record of each application, including the date of its receipt and the number assigned and issued to the sponsors, shall be maintained by the election superintendent.

The election superintendent shall immediately notify in writing the public officer named for recall in the application that a recall petition has been officially issued for circulation.

The official recall petition forms shall be printed by the office of the Secretary of State and distributed to election superintendents. The form of the petition shall be as provided in Code Section 21-4-7.

AFFIDAVIT OF CIRCULATOR AND PETITION CHAIRPERSON State of Georgia County of Under the penalty of a violation of of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to false swearing, punishable by a fine not to exceed $1,000.00 or by imprisonment of not less than one nor more than five years, or both, we the undersigned do depose and say that each person sponsoring or signing the recall application of is an elector of the electoral district of the officer sought to be recalled and further depose and say that the fact or facts upon which the ground or grounds for recall are based are true. Code Section 16-10-71 (Signature of circulator) (Residence address) (Number and street or route) (City) (Signature of petition chairperson) (Residence address) (Number and street or route) (City) Subscribed and sworn to before me this day of , . Notary public , Georgia My commission expires on the day of , .

History.

Code 1981, §

21-4-5

, enacted by Ga. L. 1989, p. 1721, § 1; Ga. L. 1990, p. 1939, §§ 2-4; Ga. L. 1999, p. 21, § 1; Ga. L. 1999, p. 23, § 3; Ga. L. 2001, p. 230, § 19.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1990, p. 1939, § 8, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that the Act shall only apply to recall proceedings under Chapter 4 of Title 21 which are instituted on or after July 1, 1990.

Law reviews.

For note on the 2001 amendment to this Code section, see 18 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 114 (2001).

For article, “Local Government Law,” see 53 Mercer L. Rev. 389 (2001).

21-4-6.
Review of grounds for recall petition.

Within four days after the date of submission of the application for a recall petition for verification, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, and legal holidays, the officer sought to be recalled may file a petition in the superior court of the county in which such officer is domiciled applying for a review of the sufficiency of the ground or grounds for the recall and the fact or facts upon which such ground or grounds are based as set forth in such recall application.

The superior court having jurisdiction of a case governed by this chapter shall be presided over by a superior court judge or senior judge. The superior court judge or senior judge who presides over the case shall be selected as set out in subsection (c) of this Code section.

Upon the filing of a sufficiency review petition under this Code section, the clerk of superior court having jurisdiction shall immediately notify the administrative judge for the judicial administrative district in which that county lies, or the district court administrator, who shall immediately notify the administrative judge of the institution of proceedings under this chapter. If the county in which the proceedings were instituted is not in the circuit of the administrative judge, the administrative judge shall select a superior court judge from within the district, but not from the circuit in which the proceeding was instituted, or a senior judge who is not a resident of the circuit in which the proceeding was instituted, to preside over the contest.

If the administrative judge is a member of the circuit in which the proceeding was filed, or if the other judges of the district are unable or are unwilling to preside over the proceeding, or if the other judges of the district are judges of the circuit in which the proceeding was filed, then the administrative judge shall select an administrative judge of an adjoining district to select a superior court judge from that district, or a superior court judge from the district in which the proceeding was filed, but not the circuit in which the proceeding was filed, or a senior judge who is not a resident of the circuit wherein the proceeding was filed.

After a judge has agreed to preside over the case, the administrative judge who selected the judge to hear the matter shall enter an order in the superior court of the county where the proceeding was filed appointing such judge, and such judge shall promptly begin presiding over such proceedings in such court and shall determine same as soon as practicable. Such judge shall be reimbursed for his actual expenses for food and lodging and shall receive the same mileage as any other state officials and employees. Senior judges shall be entitled to compensation and reimbursement as the law provides for senior judge service.

Such review shall be limited solely to a review of the legal sufficiency of the recall ground or grounds and the legal sufficiency of the alleged fact or facts upon which such ground or grounds are based as set forth in such recall application. The review of such alleged fact or facts shall include a determination of whether probable cause exists to believe that such alleged fact or facts are true. The burden shall be on the petition chairperson to prove that such probable cause exists. The judge shall consider such review petitions on an expedited basis. Discovery shall be permitted but shall not delay the consideration of the review petition by the judge. The judge may enter such orders as the judge deems necessary and appropriate to expedite any discovery and the consideration of the review petition.

During the pendency of the review by the superior court, all other recall proceedings shall be suspended. If a ruling of sufficiency is rendered by such judge, then recall proceedings shall continue in the manner provided for in this chapter. The time for circulating a recall petition after the review of the sufficiency petition shall begin from the date of the order of the superior court or the issuance of recall petition forms, whichever is later, notwithstanding the fact that recall petition forms were issued before the filing of the petition for review of the sufficiency of the recall application. Valid signatures obtained on a recall petition prior to the filing of a petition for review of the sufficiency of a recall application shall be counted. The officer sought to be recalled may file a discretionary appeal in the Supreme Court of Georgia within ten days after the date of an order finding a recall application sufficient, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, and legal holidays, and such court shall consider such appeal on an expedited basis. The filing of such appeal shall not operate to stay the recall proceedings. If a ruling of insufficiency is rendered by such judge, then a discretionary appeal may be filed in the Supreme Court of Georgia within ten days after the date of such ruling, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, and legal holidays, and such court shall consider such appeal on an expedited basis.

History.

Code 1981, §

21-4-6

, enacted by Ga. L. 1989, p. 1721, § 1; Ga. L. 1990, p. 1939, §§ 5, 6; Ga. L. 1991, p. 608, § 3; Ga. L. 1998, p. 1107, § 1.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1990, p. 1939, § 8, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that the Act shall only apply to recall proceedings under Chapter 4 of Title 21 which are instituted on or after July 1, 1990.

21-4-7.
Recall petition — Form.

The form of the recall petition shall be substantially as follows:

Click to view

Click to view

_______________
_______________

Click to view

The following statements shall be written or printed on each petition and each signer must read, or be read, the following statements:

“(1) Any person who gives or receives money or any other thing of value for signing a recall petition or for signing an affidavit of signature withdrawal shall be guilty of a misdemeanor;

Each recall petition shall contain a statement specifically designating the name and office of the official sought to be recalled, a statement that the named official has, while holding public office, conducted himself or herself in a manner which relates to and adversely affects the administration of his or her office and adversely affects the rights and interests of the public, a statement containing the appropriate ground or grounds for recall as set forth in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (7) of Code Section 21-4-3, and a brief statement of the fact or facts upon which such ground or grounds are based. Such statements shall be written or printed on each petition and each signer must read, or be read, such statements.

RECALL PETITION (Official application no.) (County or city) To (Name of election superintendent) (Address) (City, state, ZIP Code) We, the electors registered to vote in the recall election herein petitioned, demand the recall of (Name and office) on the grounds that said official has, while holding public office, conducted himself or herself in a manner which relates to and adversely affects the administration of his or her office and adversely affects the rights and interest of the public and that said official (State the appropriate ground or grounds for recall as set forth in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (7) of and a brief statement, not to exceed five lines, of the fact or facts upon which such ground or grounds are based.). Code Section 21-4-3 Date of Residence County of Name Signing Address Residence (Signature) (Number and street or route) (Printed name of elector) (City) (Ten lines for signatures and printed names)

Display Image

FORM

(2)

If (insert appropriate number) electors sign this petition, there will be an election at which a majority of the electors voting therein will determine whether the above-named official will be removed from office.”

History.

Code 1981, §

21-4-7

, enacted by Ga. L. 1989, p. 1721, § 1; Ga. L. 1992, p. 56, § 1.

21-4-8.
Recall petition — Electors eligible to sign; procedure for circulating; obtaining and verifying signatures; form for affidavit of circulator; change in signature and residence address.

All signers of a single recall petition shall be electors who are registered and eligible to vote in the recall election and who reside in the electoral district of the officer sought to be recalled. When a petition for the recall of a public official is circulated in more than one county, each sheet of the petition shall bear the name of the county in which it is circulated, and only electors of the designated county may sign such sheet. No recall petition shall be circulated or signed by any person in any location where alcoholic beverages are sold or served.

Every elector signing a recall petition shall do so in the presence of the person circulating the petition, who is to execute the affidavit of verification on the reverse side of the petition form. At the time of signing, the elector shall sign his name, and such elector or the person circulating the petition shall print the name of the elector below the elector’s signature and shall print or write in the appropriate spaces following the signature the elector’s residence address, giving number and street or route and city, the name of the county, and the date on which the elector signed the petition. No notary public may sign the petition as an elector or serve as a circulator of any petition which he or she notarized. Any and all sheets of a recall petition that have the circulator’s affidavit notarized by a notary public who also served as a circulator of one or more sheets of the recall petition or who signed one of the sheets of the petition as an elector shall be disqualified and rejected.

If an elector is incapable of signing his or her own name, he or she may specifically request the circulator of the petition to sign and print his or her name and complete the information required on the petition sheet to accompany the signature; provided, however, that the circulator shall also sign his or her full name beside the printed name of such elector.

The person before whom the electors signed the recall petition shall verify, in an affidavit subscribed and sworn to by him or her before a notary public, that each of the names on the petition form was signed in his or her presence on the date indicated and that in his or her belief each signer was an elector of the electoral district of the officer sought to be recalled.

The affidavit printed on the reverse side of each recall petition form shall be in the following form:

Click to view

An elector may change the way his or her signature and residence address appear on the recall petition at any time prior to the filing of the petition for verification by striking through his or her name and initialing the strike-through and re-signing the petition with his or her printed name corrected accordingly.

AFFIDAVIT OF CIRCULATOR State of Georgia County of Under the penalty of a violation of of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to false swearing, punishable by a fine not to exceed $1,000.00 or by imprisonment of not less than one nor more than five years, or both, I do depose and say that I am an elector registered to vote in the recall election herein petitioned for and that each petitioner signed or caused to be signed the foregoing petition in my presence on the date indicated; and I believe that each signer’s name and residence address are correctly stated, and that each signer is an elector of the electoral district in which such recall election will be conducted, and that each signer has read, or was read, the required statements which are also set out on each petition. Code Section 16-10-71 (Signature of affiant) (Residence address) (Number and street or route) (City) Subscribed and sworn to before me this day of , . Notary public , Georgia My commission expires on the day of , .

History.

Code 1981, §

21-4-8

, enacted by Ga. L. 1989, p. 1721, § 1; Ga. L. 1999, p. 21, § 1; Ga. L. 1999, p. 23, § 4.

21-4-9.
Recall application or petition — Procedure for withdrawal of signature; contents and form of affidavit to be executed and filed by person desiring to withdraw signature.

At any time prior to the date an application for recall petition or a recall petition is filed for verification, an elector who has signed the application or the recall petition form may request withdrawal of his or her signature from the application or recall petition by executing and filing an affidavit, in the form prescribed by this Code section, with the election superintendent. Any signature so withdrawn shall not be counted in determining the legal sufficiency of the application or recall petition. The affidavit shall:

Be signed and sworn to before a notary public;

State the elector’s residence address, giving number and street or route and city, the name of the county of residence, and, in the case of a recall application or petition, the number of the recall application or petition which he or she signed; and

Affirm the elector’s intention to withdraw his or her signature from the application or recall petition.

The affidavit shall be substantially in the following form:

Click to view

(e)

The affidavit printed on the reverse side of each recall petition form shall be in the following form:

AFFIDAVIT OF SIGNATURE WITHDRAWAL State of Georgia County of I, (Name as it appears on the application or recall petition), being first duly sworn, say that I am an elector of the (electoral district) in which the recall election will be conducted. That my residence address is (Number and street or route) (City) That I signed or caused to be signed the application or the petition for the recall of (Name and office of person sought to be recalled) and that the recall application or petition has been assigned number . That it is my intention by the signing and filing of this affidavit to withdraw my signature therefrom. Signature of elector Subscribed and sworn to before me this day of , . Notary public , Georgia My commission expires on the day of , .

History.

Code 1981, §

21-4-9

, enacted by Ga. L. 1989, p. 1721, § 1; Ga. L. 1993, p. 118, § 1; Ga. L. 1999, p. 21, § 1.

21-4-10.
Recall petition or application — Persons who may not circulate petition or application; effect of signatures obtained by unqualified persons.

No registration officer or other person authorized by law to register electors and no person other than an elector of the electoral district of the officer sought to be recalled shall circulate a recall application or petition. No employee of the state shall circulate a recall application or petition. All signatures obtained by any such unqualified person shall be void and shall not be counted in determining the legal sufficiency of the petition.

History.

Code 1981, §

21-4-10

, enacted by Ga. L. 1989, p. 1721, § 1.

21-4-11.
Recall petition — Determination of legal sufficiency of petition; time period for filing; amendment; notification of various persons of legal sufficiency of petition.

The election superintendent shall be responsible for determining the legal sufficiency of the recall petition within 30 days after it has been filed with him or her; provided, however, that in cases where more than one recall petition is subject to review for verification, the election superintendent shall be responsible for determining the legal sufficiency of any recall petition within 45 days after it has been filed with him or her. The election superintendent or a designee is granted unrestricted authority to examine the registration records maintained by the board of registrars, to receive evidence and testimony, and to require the personal appearance of any person signing such recall petition for the purpose of determining if the signers are qualified electors eligible to sign the recall petition. If the election superintendent shall not be reasonably able to ascertain that any signature is that of a qualified elector eligible to sign the recall petition, such signature shall not be counted in determining whether the petition contains a sufficient number of signatures as required by law. The nullification of a signature on any sheet of the recall petition shall not affect the validity of other signatures contained on such sheet.

A recall petition shall not be accepted for verification for:

Any state-wide office if more than 90 days have elapsed since the date the official recall petition forms were issued to the sponsors;

Any officer holding an office other than state-wide office and for whom not less than 5,000 signatures are required for the recall petition under paragraph (2) of subsection (a) of Code Section 21-4-4 if more than 45 days have elapsed since the date the official recall petition forms were issued to the sponsor; or

Any officer holding an office other than a state-wide office and for whom less than 5,000 signatures are required under paragraph (2) of subsection (a) of Code Section 21-4-4 if more than 30 days have elapsed since the date the official recall petition forms were issued to the sponsors.

No recall petition shall be amended, supplemented, or returned after it has been filed with the election superintendent for verification.

If a recall petition contains more than one sheet, such recall petition shall, when offered for filing, be bound together and each sheet shall be numbered consecutively at the foot of each page beginning with page one.

Within five days, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, and legal holidays, after the election superintendent has certified the legal sufficiency of a petition, he or she shall immediately notify the Governor or the appropriate official, who shall call the recall election as provided in Code Section 21-4-13.

Upon certifying the legal sufficiency or insufficiency of a recall petition, the election superintendent shall immediately notify the petition chairman and the officeholder in writing of the results and officially file the certification of the petition.

History.

Code 1981, §

21-4-11

, enacted by Ga. L. 1989, p. 1721, § 1; Ga. L. 1990, p. 1939, § 7.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1990, p. 1939, § 8, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that the Act shall only apply to recall proceedings under Chapter 4 of Title 21 which are instituted on or after July 1, 1990.

21-4-12.
No recall election when officeholder resigns prior to the holding of a recall election.

If an officeholder resigns prior to the holding of a recall election no recall election shall be conducted.

History.

Code 1981, §

21-4-12

, enacted by Ga. L. 1989, p. 1721, § 1.